Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-909
Ballot box; inspection and use; election officials; duties.

Before any ballot is deposited in the ballot box, the ballot box shall be publicly opened and exhibited and the judges and clerks of election shall see that no ballot is in the box. The ballot box shall then be locked and the key delivered to one of the judges of election or, in counties having an election commissioner, to the precinct inspector. A ballot box which contains ballots that will be counted using a scanner may be opened prior to the hour established by law for the closing of the polls at the discretion of the election commissioner or county clerk.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 252;

Laws 2003, LB 358, § 20;

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 33;

Laws 2007, LB646, § 8.